District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.63

Certain representations prohibited.

Unless licensed to practice architecture under this subchapter, no person shall engage, directly or indirectly, in the practice of architecture in the District or use the title “architect,” “registered architect,” “licensed architect,” “architectural designer,” or display or use any words, letters, figures, titles, signs, cards, advertisements, or any other symbols or devices indicating, or tending to indicate, that the person is an architect or is practicing architecture.

History

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2853.63.